Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.100

Judgment, how pleaded.

In pleading a judgment or other determination of or proceeding before a court or officer of special jurisdiction, it is not necessary to state in the indictment or information the facts conferring jurisdiction; but the judgment, determination or proceeding may be stated to have been duly given or made. The facts conferring jurisdiction, however, must be established on the trial.

[ 1891 c 28 s 32; Code 1881 s 1017; 1873 p 227 s 200; 1869 p 242 s 195; 1854 p 112 s 65; RRS s 2068.]